South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S879.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 14 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 14-11-25.  (A) The initial term of office for a master-in-equity of a court that is established under this chapter after January 1, 2027, begins on July 1 in the year in which the court is established. (B) Notwithstanding another provision of law, if the term of office for a master-in-equity on January 1, 2027, is scheduled to expire: (1) on or before July 1 in its expiration year, then the term expires on June 30 of that same year; (2) after July 1 in its expiration year, then the term expires on June 30 the following year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. ----XX----